Utah statutes.
53A-1a-523.   Property tax exemption for property owned by a charter school.

For purposes of a property tax exemption for property of school districts under Subsection 59-2-1101(3)(a)(ii)(B), a charter school is considered to be a school district.



Enacted by Chapter 436, 2011 General Session

